District of Columbia statutes.
24-1104

Enforcement of Compact.

The courts, departments, agencies, and officers of the District of Columbia shall enforce the Compact and shall take such action as may be necessary to carry out the purposes and intent of the Compact which may be within their respective jurisdictions.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 666, Pub. L. 91-358, title IV, § 402

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1104.
1973 Ed., § 32-1104.